Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 108. PENITENTIARIES

Art. 6203f. ENCOURAGING COTTON FARMERS TO PURCHASE PLANTING SEED FROM DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. Resolved by the House of Representatives, the Senate concurring, That as a means toward the development of better quality cotton in Texas, the Prison System of our State, in disposing of its surplus cotton seed, give first consideration to the needs for better planting seed and that the cotton farmers be encouraged to purchase planting seed from the Prison System through their farm agents, Chambers of Commerce and other responsible mediums, and at a price above oil mill quotations sufficient to reimburse the Prison System for the added expense of handling.

Acts 1931, 42nd Leg., p. 925, H.C.R. No. 25.

Art. 6203g. AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED FOR PENITENTIARY SYSTEM TO PRODUCE AND SELL FARM PRODUCTS TO STATE INSTITUTIONS. Therefore, be it resolved by the Senate of Texas, and the House of Representatives concurring, that the Board of Control of the State of Texas and the Board of Commissioners of the State of Texas are hereby authorized, empowered and instructed to enter into an agreement whereby the Penitentiary System will grow, produce and sell farm products to the various State Institutions at a price not to exceed the lowest bid which the Board of Control may receive from competitive bidders for the various products grown and offered for sale by the Penitentiary System of Texas.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., p. 732, S.J.R. No. 26.